Wisconsin, session 2025, AB149.
do enact as follows:AB149,1Section 1. 8.18 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:8.18 (1) Candidates Except as provided under sub. (3), candidates for the senate and assembly nominated by each political party at the primary, the state officers, and the holdover state senators of each political party shall meet in the state capitol at 10 a.m. on the first Tuesday in October of each year in which there is a presidential election.AB149,2Section 2. 8.18 (3) of the statutes is created to read:8.18 (3) If, in a presidential election year, a political party does not have a candidate for the senate or assembly nominated by the political party at the primary, state officer, or holdover state senator, in lieu of a convention under sub. (1), no later than 10 a.m. on the first Tuesday in October preceding the presidential election, the chairperson of the state committee of the political party shall do all of the following:(a) Nominate for the party one presidential elector from each congressional district and 2 electors from the state at large.(b) Immediately certify the names of the nominees under par. (a) to the chairperson of the commission. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab149 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab149 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB149 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB149 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB149: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting